District of Columbia statutes.
38-1923

Assignment of foreign teachers; loyalty oath.

(a)

Each professionally qualified person from a foreign country exchanged under the provisions of this subchapter with an educational employee of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia shall during the period of such exchange serve as a substitute for the exchanged teacher and shall be assigned in the public schools of the District of Columbia as the Board of Education shall determine. Such exchange teacher shall serve without compensation for such service from the District of Columbia or any agency thereof; provided further, that the term of such assignment or exchange shall not exceed one calendar year.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any foreign teacher, instructor, or professor assigned to duties in the public schools of the District of Columbia under the provisions of this subchapter shall not be required to take an oath of office or any oath of allegiance or loyalty to the United States, but shall satisfy the Board of Education of the District of Columbia as to his personal, moral, and professional fitness to teach in the public schools of Washington, District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 28, 1950, 64 Stat. 1077, ch. 1091, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1035.
1973 Ed., § 31-699b.